Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4186.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 118A.09, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Additional investment authority. Qualifying governments may invest the amount described in subdivision 3: (1) in index mutual funds based in the United States and indexed to a broad market United States equity index, on the condition that index mutual fund investments must be made directly with the main sales office of the fund; deleted text begin ordeleted text end (2)new text begin in shares of a company that:new text end new text begin (i) is registered with the United States Securities and Exchange Commission; new text end new text begin (ii) concentrates in investment grade fixed income securities; new text end new text begin (iii) holds, at the time of purchase, at least 80 percent of its investments in federally insured or guaranteed securities, including by government sponsored entities; and new text end new text begin (iv) has a mission, in part, to provide direct investment in local multifamily housing development; or new text end new text begin (3)new text end with the Minnesota State Board of Investment subject to such terms and minimum amounts as may be adopted by the board. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 118A.09, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 3a. new text end new text begin Housing and redevelopment authorities; investment authority. new text end new text begin A housing and redevelopment authority created in a county or statutory or home rule charter city that meets the criteria of subdivision 1, paragraph (a), clause (1) or (2), may invest its funds in investments that meet the criteria of subdivision 2, clause (2), subject to the limitations and requirements for qualifying governments under subdivisions 3 and 4. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 118A.09, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Approval. Before investing pursuant to this section, the governing body of the qualifying government must adopt a resolutionnew text begin or investment policynew text end that includes the following statements: (1) the governing body understands that investments under subdivision 2 have a risk of loss; (2) the governing body understands the type of funds that are being invested and the specific investment itself; and (3) the governing body certifies that all funds designated for investment through the State Board of Investment meet the requirements of this section and the policies and procedures established by the State Board of Investment. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end